Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4734.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 66h. Nothing in this act shall be construed as empowering This act does not empower any physician or surgeon, or any officer or representative of the this state or county departments of social welfare, the department, in carrying out the provisions of this act, to compel any person, individual, either child or adult, to undergo a surgical operation, or to accept any form of medical treatment contrary to the wishes of said person. that individual. If the person individual for whom surgical or medical treatment is recommended is not of sound mind, or is not in a condition to make decisions for himself, the individual, the written consent of such person's nearest relative, or legally the individual's patient advocate designated under sections 5506 to 5520 of the estates and protected individuals code, 1998 PA 386, MCL 700.5506 to 700.5520, an appointed guardian under article V of the estates and protected individuals code, 1998 PA 386, MCL 700.5101 to 700.5520, a surrogate designated under section 5602 of the estates and protected individuals code, 1998 PA 386, 700.5602, or a person standing in loco parentis , shall must be secured before such the medical or surgical treatment is given. This provision section is not intended to prevent temporary first aid from being given in case of if there is an accident or sudden acute illness where and the consent of those concerned cannot be immediately obtained. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01584'25) or House Bill No. 4418 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.